Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5583.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-24 of the General Laws entitled "Zoning Ordinances" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-24-46.6. Utility scale solar energy projects.
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the development of utility
scale solar projects shall be limited to projects where the free-standing solar energy structure is on
property where the structure is providing energy to an urban area of residential properties, a
commercial property or otherwise occupying other developed accessory portions of a residential or
commercial property to include, but not be limited to, roof tops, parking lots and developed
property.
(b) Forested land, farmland, undeveloped property consisting of one acre or more and other
rural areas of land shall not be utilized for utility scale solar projects.
(c) For purposes of this section "a utility scale solar project" means a project that produces
ten megawatts (10 MW) or more of energy, or produces electricity for sale pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 26.4 of title 39.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001546
========